District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-201.40

Fire insurance companies formed prior to January 1, 1902, may become perpetual.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1289, ch. 854, § 641
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(1), 58 DCR 1720

History

2001 Ed., § 29-201.40.
1981 Ed., § 29-237.
1973 Ed., § 29-237.

Prior Codifications